Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1302
State Employees
Retirement System; established; operative date; official name; acceptance
of contributions.

(1) An employees retirement
system is hereby established for the purpose of providing a retirement annuity
or other benefits for employees as provided by the State Employees Retirement Act and sections 84-1332
and 84-1333. The retirement system so created shall begin operation
January 1, 1964. It shall be known as the State Employees Retirement System
of the State of Nebraska and by such name shall transact all business and
hold all cash and other property as provided in such sections.

(2) The retirement system shall not accept as contributions
any money from members or the state except the following:

(a) Mandatory contributions established by sections 84-1308
and 84-1309;

(b) Money that is a repayment of refunded contributions made
pursuant to section 84-1322;

(c) Contributions for military service credit made pursuant
to section 84-1325;

(d) Actuarially required contributions pursuant to subdivision
(4)(b) of section 84-1319;

(e) Trustee-to-trustee transfers pursuant to section 84-1313.01;
or

(f) Corrections ordered by the board pursuant to section
84-1305.02.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 2, p. 1668;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 61;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 24;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 9.